Alabama, session 2026rs, HB434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-23-197, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§40-23-197
Page 1

"§40-23-197
HB434 INTRODUCED
(a) The proceeds of the simplified sellers use tax paid
pursuant to this part shall be appropriated to the department,
which shall retain the amount necessary to fund the
administrative costs of implementing and operating the program
and to cover the amounts paid for refunds authorized in
Section 40-23-196. The balance of the amounts collected shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) FiftyThirty-seven and one-half percent to the State
Treasury and allocated 75 percent to the State General Fund.
and
(2) 25 Eleven and one-quarter percent to the State
Treasury and allocated to the Education Trust Fund.
(3) One and one-quarter percent to the local boards of
education in the state on the basis of the ratio of the
average daily membership of each board to the total statewide
average daily membership for the preceding school year.
(2)(4) Twenty-five percentTwenty percent to each the
county counties in the state and deposited into the general
fund of the respective county commission on thea prorated
basis accordingof the ratio of the to population of each
county to the total population of all counties in the state as
determined in the most recent federal census prior to the
distribution.
(3)(5) Twenty-fiveThirty percent of funds to be
distributed to each the municipality municipalities in the
state on a proratedthe basis of the ratio of theaccording to
population of each municipality to the total population of all
municipalities in the state as determined in the most recent
Page 2

municipalities in the state as determined in the most recent
HB434 INTRODUCED
federal census prior to the distribution.
(b) Effective for tax periods beginning on or after
January 1, 2019, the net proceeds after the distribution
provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) shall be
distributed 60 percent to each municipality in the state on a
basis of the ratio of the population of each municipality to
the total population of all municipalities in the state as
determined in the most recent federal census prior to
distribution and 40 percent to each county in the state, and
deposited into the general fund of the respective county
commission, on a basis of the ratio of the population of each
county to the total population of all counties in the state as
determined in the most recent federal census prior to the
distribution.
(c) The distribution of the proceeds from the
simplified sellers use tax distributed pursuant to
subdivisions (a)(3) through (5)paid to counties and
municipalities shall occur quarterly monthly in a manner
prescribed by the department."
Section 2. Section 40-23-197.1, Code of Alabama 1975,
regarding monthly distributions of simplified sellers use tax
proceeds, is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3